New York, session 2025-2026, A159.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph b of paragraph 4 of subdivision 41 of section 2 375 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 143 of the 3 laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. In addition to the red and white lights authorized to be displayed 5 pursuant to paragraph two of this subdivision, one or more blue lights 6 or combination blue and red lights or combination blue, red and white 7 lights may be affixed to a police vehicle, fire vehicle, ambulance, 8 emergency ambulance service vehicle, and county emergency medical 9 services vehicle provided that such blue light or lights shall be 10 displayed on a [police vehicle,] fire vehicle, ambulance, emergency 11 ambulance service vehicle, and county emergency medical services vehicle 12 for rear projection only, and provided further that such blue light or 13 lights may be displayed on a police vehicle for rear projection and 14 forward projection. If such blue light is displayed on a police vehicle 15 for forward projection, such blue light shall be displayed in combina- 16 tion with a red and/or white light. In the event that the trunk or rear 17 gate of a police vehicle, fire vehicle, ambulance, emergency ambulance 18 service vehicle, and county emergency medical services vehicle obstructs 19 or diminishes the visibility of other emergency lighting on such vehi- 20 cles, a blue light may be affixed to and displayed from the trunk, rear 21 gate or interior of such vehicles. Such lights may be displayed on a 22 police vehicle, fire vehicle, ambulance, emergency ambulance service 23 vehicle, and county emergency medical services vehicle when such vehi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01151-01-5 A. 159 2 1 cles are engaged in an emergency operation. Nothing contained in this 2 subparagraph shall be deemed to authorize the use of blue lights on 3 police vehicles, fire vehicles, ambulances, emergency ambulance service 4 vehicles, and county emergency medical services vehicles unless such 5 vehicles also display one or more red or combination red and white 6 lights as otherwise authorized in this subdivision. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.